Maine, session 132, LD810.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3132, sub-§6-C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 644, §2, is
further amended by enacting at the end a new blocked paragraph to read:
For the purposes of this subsection, a high-impact electric transmission line is deemed to
have received the majority legislative approval required by this subsection if the high-
impact electric transmission line is approved for a contract after a competitive procurement
conducted by the commission or a state agency pursuant to statutory authority granted
under this Title.
Page 1 - 132LR2391(03)